Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.12.040

Independent evaluation.

(1) The secretary of state may rely on the results of independent design, engineering, and performance evaluations in the examination under RCW 29A.12.020 if the source and scope of these independent evaluations are specified by rule.

(2) The secretary of state may contract with experts in mechanical or electrical engineering or data processing to assist in examining a voting system or component. The manufacturer or distributor who has submitted a voting system for testing under RCW 29A.12.030 shall pay the secretary of state a deposit to reimburse the cost of any contract for consultation under this section and for any other unrecoverable costs associated with the examination of a voting system or component by the manufacturer or distributor who submitted the voting system or component for examination.

[ 2003 c 111 s 304. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 20; 1982 c 40 s 3. Formerly RCW 29.33.061.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—1990 c 59: See notes following RCW 29A.04.013.

Severability—1982 c 40: See note following RCW 29A.12.020.